New York, session 2025-2026, A4015.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision h of section 1180 of the vehicle 2 and traffic law, as amended by section 6 of part C of chapter 62 of the 3 laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 4 3. Every person convicted of a violation of paragraph two of subdivi- 5 sion (d), subdivision (f) or (g) of this section shall be punished as 6 follows: 7 (i) Where the court or tribunal records or enters that the speed upon 8 which the conviction was based exceeded the applicable speed limit by 9 not more than ten miles per hour, by a fine of not less than ninety nor 10 more than one hundred [fifty] seventy-five dollars; 11 (ii) Where the court or tribunal records or enters that the speed upon 12 which the conviction was based exceeded the applicable speed limit by 13 more than ten miles per hour, but not more than thirty miles per hour, 14 by a fine of not less than one hundred eighty nor more than three 15 hundred fifty dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days, 16 or by both such fine and imprisonment, provided, however, that where the 17 vehicle is either (A) in violation of any rules or regulations involving 18 an out-of-service defect relating to brake systems, steering components 19 and/or coupling devices, or (B) transporting flammable gas, radioactive 20 materials or explosives, the fine shall be three hundred fifty dollars 21 or imprisonment for not more than thirty days, or both such fine and 22 imprisonment; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06968-02-5 A. 4015--A 2 1 (iii) Where the court or tribunal records or enters that the speed 2 upon which the conviction was based exceeded the applicable speed limit 3 by more than thirty miles per hour, by a fine of not less than three 4 hundred sixty nor more than [six] seven hundred dollars or by imprison- 5 ment for not more than thirty days or by both such fine and imprison- 6 ment, provided, however, that where the vehicle is either (A) in 7 violation of any rules or regulations involving an out-of-service defect 8 relating to brake systems, steering components and/or coupling devices, 9 or (B) transporting flammable gas, radioactive materials or explosives, 10 the fine shall be [six] seven hundred dollars or imprisonment for not 11 more than thirty days, or both such fine and imprisonment. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026 and shall apply to 13 violations occurring on or after such date.